Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.115

Director of retirement systems to adopt rules governing disability boards—Remand of orders not in accordance with rules.

(1) The director of retirement systems shall adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, under which each disability board shall execute its disability retirement duties under this chapter. The rules shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) Standards governing the type and manner of presentation of medical, employability, and other evidence before disability boards; and

(b) Standards governing the necessity and frequency of medical and employability reexaminations of persons receiving disability benefits.

(2) If the director determines that an order or determination of a disability board was not processed in accordance with the rules established under this section, the director may remand the order or determination for further proceedings consistent with the rules.

[ 1981 c 294 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 294: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1981 c 294 s 16.]